Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Article 3. Mississippi Library Commission.

§ 39-3-101.
Creation; composition; qualifications, appointment and terms of office of members.

There is hereby created a board of commissioners of the Mississippi Library Commission to be composed of five members appointed by the governor with overlapping terms, the members of the first board to be appointed one for one year, one for two years, one for three years, one for four years, one for five years, and their successors each to be appointed for five year terms, each member to serve until his successor is appointed. Two members shall be appointed by the governor from the state at large. Two members shall be appointed by the governor from a list of not less than six names submitted by the Mississippi library association, one of whom shall be a librarian who is a graduate of a library school accredited by the American Library Association and actively engaged in full time library work at the time of the appointment and one of whom shall be, at time of the appointment, a member of a legally organized board of trustees of a Mississippi free public library; and one member shall be the president of the Mississippi Federation of Women’s Clubs, or a member of said federation recommended by her; and which federation member shall, when appointed, serve a full term as herein provided for members to serve under a staggered term basis, and the successor to the federation member shall be the president of the federation then serving, or a member of the federation recommended by her, when the term of the federation member shall expire; and after the appointment of a federation member to the board, and when her term as a member thereof shall expire, each succeeding member of the federation who becomes a member of the board shall serve a full term under the provisions of this article. Vacancies created by resignation shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6210-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after June 30, 1950.

§ 39-3-103.
Organizational meeting; officers.

Within thirty days after the selection and appointment of the first board of commissioners the members shall meet at the headquarters of the Mississippi Library Commission in Jackson, Mississippi, and organize, setting up such policies as are deemed necessary and not inconsistent with this article. They shall elect annually from their membership a chairman and a secretary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6210-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, § 3, eff from and after June 30, 1950.

§ 39-3-105.
Director.

The board of library commissioners shall elect a director whose term of office shall be for a period of four years, unless, for good cause shown, the board of library commissioners removes said director.

The director shall be chosen outside the membership of the board of library commissioners, and shall be a trained, experienced librarian holding a degree from a college or university of recognized standing. The director shall have completed the required course covered in a school of library service accredited by the American Library Association and shall have had at least two years’ experience as an administrative librarian or director of a state or public library. The director shall keep an accurate record of all accounts and financial transactions of the board, shall have charge of organizing new libraries and directing library development in the state, so as to give and furnish every citizen and resident of the state free library service of the highest quality consistent with modern methods and as may be justified by financial and economic conditions, and shall have all general administrative duties incident to carrying on the work of the Mississippi Library Commission. All necessary and actual traveling expense incurred by the members of the Mississippi Library Commission, and by the director or any member of the staff, acting under the authority and direction of the board of commissioners, while on business for the Mississippi Library Commission, shall be paid from the funds appropriated and made available for use, maintenance and operation of the Mississippi Library Commission. In addition to the director, the board of library commissioners may employ, upon recommendations of the director, such other persons as may be deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6210-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, §§ 4, 5, eff from and after June 30, 1950.

§ 39-3-107.
General powers and duties of commission.

The Mississippi Library Commission, upon request, shall give advice to all schools, public and other libraries, and to all communities which may propose to establish them, as to the best means of establishing and maintaining such libraries, the selection of books, cataloging and other details of library management. It may also purchase and operate traveling libraries, and circulate such traveling libraries within the state among communities, libraries, schools, colleges, universities, library associations, study clubs, charitable and penal institutions free of cost, except for transportation, and establish county and regional libraries and use any funds, separate and apart from the general library commission funds, which might come into its custody from any source, for such purpose, and for the purpose of establishing, stimulating, increasing, improving and equalizing library service in the various counties within the state, under such rules for safekeeping, preservation, care, handling of the books and allocation of the funds as may be fixed by the commission. It may publish such lists and circulars of information as it shall deem necessary, and it may also conduct a summer school of library instruction and a clearinghouse for periodicals for free gifts to local libraries. The commission shall each year obtain from all libraries in the state reports showing the condition, growth, development and manner of conducting such libraries, together with such other facts and statistics regarding the same as may be deemed of public interest by the commission, and it shall be the duty of the board of the Mississippi Library Commission to make an annual report to the Legislature of the facts of public interest and value in relation to the work of the commission. The Mississippi Library Commission shall adopt rules and regulations relative to the allocation of state aid funds to public library systems.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5391; 1942, §§ 6210-04, 6213; Laws, 1926, ch. 180; Laws, 1940, ch. 143; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 358, § 1, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-109.
How funds drawn.

The board of commissioners of the Mississippi Library Commission may from time to time as needed draw an order signed by the director and the chairman in favor of any party to whom money is due stating in such order what the money is to be used for, and, upon presentation of such order, the state auditor shall draw his warrant upon the state treasurer for the amount therefor not to exceed the amount of the appropriation for the purposes of the Mississippi Library Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6210-05; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, § 7, eff from and after June 30, 1950.

§ 39-3-111.
Acceptance of gifts and federal funds.

The board of commissioners of the Mississippi Library Commission may accept in the name of the state gifts of money, real estate, books, periodicals, or other property for the purpose of promoting the work of the Mississippi Library Commission, and may accept and administer any funds which might be provided by the federal government for library purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6210-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 363, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1950.